District of Columbia statutes.
15-307

Lien of execution.

A writ of fieri facias issued upon a judgment of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the Superior Court of the District of Columbia is a lien from the time of its delivery to the marshal upon all the goods and chattels of the judgment defendant, except those that are exempted from levy and sale by express provision of law, and is also a lien upon the equitable interest of the judgment defendant in goods and chattels in his possession.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(5)

History

1981 Ed., § 15-307.
1973 Ed., § 15-307.

Prior Codifications